District of Columbia statutes.
31-2502.15

Formation of domestic companies.

Any domestic stock, mutual, or reciprocal company desiring to transact business in the District shall, after complying with the general laws of the District governing the formation of companies or corporations, file with the Commissioner copies of its articles of incorporation, bylaws, charter, proposed forms of policies, and such other information as may be necessary to manifest and explain the organization, objects, and purposes of the company, and to satisfy the Commissioner that such company has complied with the laws of the District regarding the formation of companies. Thereafter, upon application made to the Commissioner upon such forms as the Commissioner shall prescribe, the Commissioner, subject to the provisions of § 31-2502.02, shall issue to the company a certificate of authority to transact business in the District.

Oct. 9, 1940, 54 Stat. 1071, ch. 792, ch. II, § 15
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(r)(2), 44 DCR 1730
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-2501.03.
1973 Ed., § 35-1318.
1981 Ed., § 35-1518.